District of Columbia statutes.
21-2051

Protective proceedings.

(a)

Upon petition and after notice and hearing in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter, the court may appoint a conservator or make any other protective order for cause as provided in this section.

(b)

Appointment of a conservator or other protective order may be made in relation to the estate and affairs of an individual, if the court determines that either the individual is an incapacitated individual according to section 21-2011(11), has disappeared, is being detained by a foreign power, or is being held hostage by someone other than a foreign power and:

(1)

The individual has property that will be wasted or dissipated unless property management is provided; or

(2)

Money is needed for the support, care, and welfare of the individual or those entitled to the individual’s support and protection is necessary or desirable to obtain and provide money.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 14(t), 45 DCR 745

History

This section is referenced in § 21-2044 and § 21-2056.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 21-2051.

Prior Codifications

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2-301 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).

Editor's Notes